Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.310

Penalties—Injunctions—Referring a violation to the county prosecutor—Jurisdiction.

(1) It is a misdemeanor for any person willfully to:

(a) Violate or aid in the violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter;

(b) Submit a false or fraudulent report, statement, or record required by the director or the commission under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter; or

(c) Fail or refuse to submit a report, statement, or record required by the director or the commission under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

(2) In the event of a violation or threatened violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, the director or the commission is entitled to an injunction in a court of competent jurisdiction to prevent further violation and to a decree of specific performance, and to a temporary restraining order and injunction pending litigation.

(3) In the event of a violation or threatened violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, the director, the commission, or any affected producer on joining the commission may refer the violation to the prosecutor in any county in which the defendant or any defendant resides, or in which the violation was committed, or in which the defendant or any defendant has his or her principal place of business.

(4) The superior courts are hereby vested with jurisdiction to enforce this chapter and the rules of the commission issued under this chapter, and to prevent and restrain violations of this chapter.

[ 2009 c 33 s 32.]